Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-159
Alteration.

When, after placement of a child for adoption, it is determined by the department, in consultation with the adoptive parent or parents, that certain or all exchanges of information are no longer in the best interests of the child, the department may enter into an agreement with the biological parent or parents to alter the original contract made between the department and the biological parent or parents.

Laws 1988, LB 301, § 5.